Montana, session 2025, HB946.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Definitions -- tax year 2025 credit for 2024 payments. As used in
[sections 1 through 4], the following definitions apply:
(1) "Montana property taxes" means the ad valorem property taxes, special assessments, and
other fees imposed on property classified under 15-6-134 that is a single-family dwelling unit, unit of a multiple-
unit dwelling, trailer, manufactured home, or mobile home and as much of the surrounding land, not exceeding
1 acre, as is reasonably necessary for its use as a dwelling and that were assessed and paid by the taxpayer
for tax year 2024. The amount of Montana property taxes assessed and paid is equal to the total amount billed
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
by the local government for the dwelling as shown on the 2024 property tax bill received by the taxpayer with a
first-half payment due in or around November 2024 and a second-half payment due in or around May 2025.
(2) "Owned" includes purchasing under a contract for deed and being the grantor or grantors under
a revocable trust indenture.
(3) (a) "Principal residence" is, subject to the provisions of subsection (3)(b), a dwelling:
(i) in which a taxpayer can demonstrate the taxpayer owned and lived in for at least 7 months of
the year for which the credit is claimed;
(ii) that is the only residence for which the property tax credit is claimed; and
(iii) for which the taxpayer made payment of the assessed Montana property taxes during tax year
2024.
(b) A taxpayer that cannot meet the requirements of subsection (3)(a)(i) because the taxpayer's
principal residence changes during the tax year to another principal residence may still claim a credit if the
taxpayer paid the Montana property taxes while residing in each principal residence for a total of at least 7
consecutive months for each tax year.
(4) "Tax year 2024" means the period January 1, 2024, through December 31, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Property tax credit in 2025 for 2024 payments -- manner of claiming
-- limitations -- appeals. (1) Subject to the conditions provided for in [sections 1 through 4], there is a state
property tax assistance credit for Montana property taxes in the amount of $400 or the amount of total property
taxes paid, whichever is less, for tax year 2024.
(2) The property tax assistance provided for in subsection (1) is for Montana property taxes
assessed to and paid by a taxpayer or taxpayers on property they owned and occupied as a principal residence
during the 2024 tax year. The county treasurer shall provide the property tax assistance distributed pursuant to
[section 3] to each principal residence by listing the property tax assistance amount as a credit on the property
tax bill as provided in 15-16-101(2)(a)(v). State property tax assistance provided to counties pursuant to this
section may not affect the maximum mill calculation in 15-10-420. The owner of a principal residence that
receives property tax assistance under this section is not prohibited from receiving property tax assistance
under another property tax assistance program.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
(3) The department shall mail a notice to potential claimants by June 30, 2025, for tax year 2024.
Receipt of a notice does not establish that a taxpayer or property owner is eligible for a credit on the taxpayers
2025 property tax, and a taxpayer who does not receive a notice may still be eligible to claim property tax
assistance. All taxpayers, regardless of the receipt of notice, shall claim the property tax assistance as provided
in subsection (5).
(4) Except as provided in subsections (5)(c) and (5)(d), a single-family dwelling unit, unit of a
multiple-unit dwelling, trailer, manufactured home, or mobile home and as much of the surrounding land, not
exceeding 1 acre, that is owned by an entity is not eligible to claim the property tax assistance.
(5) (a) All claims for this property tax assistance must be submitted to the department electronically
or by mail for each tax year the credit is claimed.
(i) Electronic claims must be submitted between July 15, 2025, and August 15, 2025, through the
department's website.
(ii) Claims submitted by mail must be made on a form prescribed by the department and
postmarked by August 15, 2025.
(iii) The department may not grant an extension of time if a taxpayer misses the August 15
deadline. The department's authority to consider an application terminates on August 15, 2025, and any
applications or requests for extension received after that date may not be processed.
(b) Subject to subsections (5)(c) and (5)(d), a claim for property tax assistance must be submitted,
under penalty of false swearing and the penalties provided in [section 4], on a form prescribed by the
department and must contain:
(i) an affirmation that the claimant owns and maintains the land and improvements as the principal
residence as defined in [section 1];
(ii) the geocode or other property identifier for the principal residence that the claimant is
requesting the property tax assistance on;
(iii) the social security number of the claimant and the claimant's spouse; and
(iv) any other information as required by the department that is relevant to the claimant's eligibility.
(c) The personal representative of the estate of a deceased taxpayer may execute and file the
claim for property tax assistance on behalf of a deceased taxpayer who qualifies for the property tax
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
assistance.
(d) The trustee of a grantor revocable trust may file a claim on behalf of the trust if the dwelling
meets the definition of a principal residence for the grantor.
(6) Only one credit on a tax bill for each tax year will be issued to a taxpayer for the Montana
property taxes paid by the taxpayer for tax year 2024. A credit is not available to a taxpayer that does not have
a principal residence in tax year 2025.
(7) If a debt is due and owing to the state, the department may offset the property tax assistance in
this section as provided in sections 15-30-2629, 15-30-2630, 17-4-105, or as otherwise provided by law.
(8) If property tax assistance is denied by the department, the claimant is entitled to a written
explanation why the application was denied. A claimant may make a written appeal of a denial to a
management level employee of the department who shall issue a final decision that is not appealable. Appeals
occurring under this subsection (8) are not subject to the provisions contained in 15-1-211. The department
may issue a refund to a taxpayer that appeals a decision of the department as opposed to a credit on the
taxpayer's 2025 property tax bill.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. State property tax assistance in 2025 -- appropriation. (1) (a) By
August 25, 2025, the department shall determine the amount of property tax assistance per principal residence
by multiplying the total number of principal residences approved for the credit by $400 for each principal
residence.
(b) By September 1, 2025, the department shall distribute to each county the property tax
assistance per principal residence multiplied by the number of principal residences within the county from the
state property tax assistance account provided for in [section 6]. The county shall deposit the money in the
account in which property tax revenue is held and use the distribution to provide property tax assistance
pursuant to [section 2].
(3) The department shall provide each county with a list of property in the county that qualifies as a
principal residence to enable the county treasurer to administer the property tax assistance.
(4) The payment of property tax credits and administration costs related to paying property tax
credits provided in [section 6] and this section are statutorily appropriated, as provided in 17-7-502, from the
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
state property tax assistance account established in [section 6] to the department of revenue for distribution to
counties, taxpayers that pursue an appeal, and for related administration costs.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Property tax credit in 2025 -- penalty for false or fraudulent claim. (1)
Except as provided in subsection (2), if the department discovers that property tax assistance granted to a
taxpayer exceeded the amount allowed by [sections 1 through 4], the department may, within 1 year from the
date the credit was listed on the property tax bill, assess the taxpayer for the difference. The assessment is
subject to the uniform dispute review procedure established in 15-1-211.
(2) A person who files a false or fraudulent claim for property tax assistance under [sections 1
through 4] is subject to criminal prosecution under the provisions of 45-7-202. If a false or fraudulent claim has
been credited by the department, the amount credited to the taxpayer may be recovered as any other tax owed
the state, together with a penalty of 300% of the property tax assistance and interest on the amount of the
property tax assistance claimed plus penalty at the rate of 12% a year, until paid. If this credit plus penalty
becomes due and owing, the department may issue a warrant for distraint as provided in Title 15, chapter 1,
part 7.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Property tax assistance for principal residences. (1) A county shall
provide property tax assistance to owners of principal residences certified by the department of revenue
pursuant to [section 7]. The assistance is provided with funding from the state property tax assistance account
distributed to the county as provided in [section 6].
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsection (2)(b), the county treasurer shall provide the property tax
assistance distributed pursuant to [section 6] to each principal residence by listing the property tax assistance
amount as a credit on the property tax bill as provided in 15-16-101(2)(a)(v).
(b) If the property tax assistance calculated pursuant to [section 6(2)] exceeds the property tax
billed for an individual property, the county may retain the revenue that exceeds the property tax billed.
(3) The owner of a principal residence that receives property tax assistance under this section is
not prohibited from receiving property tax assistance under another property tax assistance program.
(4) State property tax assistance provided to counties pursuant to this section may not affect the
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
maximum mill calculation in 15-10-420.

NEW SECTION. Section 6. State property tax assistance account -- appropriation. (1) There is a
state property tax assistance account in the state special revenue fund established in 17-2-102. The revenue
allocated to the account, as provided in 15-68-820, and any legislative transfers must be deposited in the
account and distributed as provided in this section.
(2) (a) Beginning in 2026, at the end of each fiscal year the department shall determine the
amount of property tax assistance per principal residence by subtracting the amounts listed in subsection (2)(c)
and dividing 50% of the remainder by the total number of principal residences certified pursuant to [section 7].
(b) Beginning in 2026, on August 31, the department shall distribute to each county the property
tax assistance per principal residence multiplied by the number of principal residences within the county. The
county shall deposit the money in the account in which property tax revenue is held and use the distribution to
provide property tax assistance pursuant to [section 5].
(c) The department may retain revenue allocated to the account that is necessary for administering
the certification of principal residences under [section 7], not to exceed $1.5 million for each fiscal year and
shall retain $100,000 for each fiscal year for appeals granted under [section 9].
(3) The department shall provide each county with a list of property in the county that the
department certifies pursuant to [section 7] as a principal residence to enable the county treasurer to administer
the property tax assistance.
(4) A payment required pursuant to this section may be withheld if, for more than 90 days, a local
government fails to:
(a) file a financial report required by 15-1-504;
(b) remit any amounts collected on behalf of the state as required by 15-1-504; or
(c) remit any other amounts owed to the state or another taxing jurisdiction.
(5) The payment of property tax credits and administration costs related to paying property tax
credits provided in this section are statutorily appropriated, as provided in 17-7-502, from the state property tax
assistance account established in this section to the department of revenue for distribution to counties and for
related administration costs.
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Certification of principal residence for state property tax assistance
-- rulemaking -- definition. (1) To receive state property tax assistance pursuant to [section 5], the owner of a
principal residence shall apply to the department for certification of the principal residence.
(2) (a) To receive state property tax assistance for the tax year in which the application is first
made, the owner shall apply electronically or by mail on a form prescribed by the department and postmarked
by March 1. Approved applications received electronically or postmarked after March 1 apply to the following
tax year.
(b) After the application is approved, the certification remains effective until:
(i) there is a change in ownership of the property;
(ii) the owner no longer uses the dwelling as a principal residence; or
(iii) the owner applies for state property tax assistance for a different principal residence.
(c) If certification is terminated pursuant to subsection (2)(b), the owner shall submit a new
application to the department to reestablish a certification.
(d) An application for state property tax assistance must be submitted on a form prescribed by the
department and must contain:
(i) a written declaration made under penalty of perjury that the applicant owns and maintains the
land and improvements as the principal residence. The application must state the penalty provided for in
[section 8].
(ii) the geocode or other property identifier for the principal residence for which the applicant is
requesting the state property tax assistance;
(iii) the social security number of the applicant; and
(iv) any other information required by the department that is relevant to the applicant's eligibility.
(3) (a) Except as provided in subsection (3)(b), class four residential property owned by an entity is
not eligible to receive the state property tax assistance.
(b) The trustee of a grantor revocable trust may apply for state property tax assistance for a
principal residence on behalf of the trust if the dwelling meets the definition of a principal residence for the
grantor.
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
(4) The department may adopt rules, prepare forms, and maintain records that are necessary to
implement this section.
(5) (a) For the purpose of [sections 8 and 9] and this section, "principal residence" means a class
four residential property:
(i) that is a single-family dwelling unit, unit of a multiple-unit dwelling, trailer, manufactured home,
or mobile home;
(ii) in which an owner can demonstrate the owner owned and lived for at least 7 months of the
year;
(iii) that is the owner's only principal residence;
(iv) that does not exceed 4.5 times the median residential value; and
(v) for which the owner made payment of the assessed Montana property taxes.
(b) An owner who cannot meet the requirements of subsection (5)(a)(ii) because the owner's
principal residence changed during the tax year to another principal residence may still qualify if the owner paid
the Montana property taxes while residing in each principal residence for a total of at least 7 consecutive
months of the tax year. The department shall establish rules for determining the property tax assistance when
the principal residences are in different counties.
(6) As used in this section, "median residential value" means the median value of a single-family
residence located in the state rounded to the nearest thousand dollars.

NEW SECTION. Section 8. State property tax assistance -- penalty for false or fraudulent
application. A person who files a false or fraudulent certification of principal residence for state property tax
assistance under [section 7] is subject to criminal prosecution under the provisions of 45-7-202 and may be
prohibited from claiming state property tax assistance for up to 10 years. If false or fraudulent property tax
assistance has been issued by the county, the amount of assistance granted may be recovered as any other
tax owed the county. If property tax assistance becomes due and owing, the department may issue a warrant
for distraint as provided in Title 15, chapter 1, part 7.

NEW SECTION. Section 9. Appeal of denial of certification of principal residence. (1) (a) If the
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
department denies an application for certification of a principal residence, the owner may request an informal
review of the denial by submitting an objection on written or electronic forms provided by the department for
that purpose in a manner prescribed by the department. The objection must be made no later than 30 days
after the date of the denial notification.
(b) The property owner may request that the department consider extenuating circumstances to
grant an application for certification of a principal residence. Extenuating circumstances include but are not
limited to extraordinary, unusual, or infrequent events that are material in nature and of a character different
from the typical or customary and that are not expected to recur.
(c) After the informal review, the department shall determine the correct status of the application
and notify the taxpayer of its determination by mail or electronically. In the notification, the department shall
state its reasons for accepting or denying the application.
(2) If a property owner is aggrieved by the determination made by the department after the review
provided for in subsection (1), the property owner has the right to first appeal to the county tax appeal board
and then to the Montana tax appeal board, whose findings are final subject to the right of review in the courts.
An appeal to the county tax appeal board, pursuant to 15-15-102, must be filed within 30 days from the date on
the notice of the department's determination. If the county tax appeal board or the Montana tax appeal board
determines that the residence should qualify as a principal residence, the department shall provide to the
property owner the amount of property tax assistance due from the amount retained pursuant to [section 6].

Section 10. Section 15-7-102, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-7-102. Notice of classification, market value, and taxable value to owners -- appeals. (1) (a)
Except as provided in 15-7-138, the department shall mail or provide electronically to each owner or purchaser
under contract for deed a notice that includes the land classification, market value, and taxable value of the
land and improvements owned or being purchased. A notice must be mailed or, with property owner consent,
provided electronically to the owner only if one or more of the following changes pertaining to the land or
improvements have been made since the last notice:
(i) change in ownership;
(ii) change in classification;
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
(iii) change in valuation; or
(iv) addition or subtraction of personal property affixed to the land.
(b) The notice must include the following for the taxpayer's informational and informal classification
and appraisal review purposes:
(i) a notice of the availability of all the property tax assistance programs available to property
taxpayers, including the state property tax assistance provided for in [section 5], the intangible land value
assistance program provided for in 15-6-240, the property tax assistance programs provided for in Title 15,
chapter 6, part 3, and the residential property tax credit for the elderly provided for in 15-30-2337 through 15-
30-2341;
(ii) the total amount of mills levied against the property in the prior year;
(iii) the market value for the prior reappraisal cycle;
(iv) if the market value has increased by more than 10%, an explanation for the increase in
valuation;
(v) a statement that the notice is not a tax bill; and
(vi) a taxpayer option to request an informal classification and appraisal review by checking a box
on the notice and returning it to the department.
(c) When the department uses an appraisal method that values land and improvements as a unit,
including the sales comparison approach for residential condominiums or the income approach for commercial
property, the notice must contain a combined appraised value of land and improvements.
(d) Any misinformation provided in the information required by subsection (1)(b) does not affect the
validity of the notice and may not be used as a basis for a challenge of the legality of the notice.
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsection (2)(c), the department shall assign each classification and
appraisal to the correct owner or purchaser under contract for deed and mail or provide electronically the notice
in written or electronic form, adopted by the department, containing sufficient information in a comprehensible
manner designed to fully inform the taxpayer as to the classification and appraisal of the property and of
changes over the prior tax year.
(b) The notice must advise the taxpayer that in order to be eligible for a refund of taxes from an
appeal of the classification or appraisal, the taxpayer is required to pay the taxes under protest as provided in
- 10 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
15-1-402.
(c) The department is not required to mail or provide electronically the notice to a new owner or
purchaser under contract for deed unless the department has received the realty transfer certificate from the
clerk and recorder as provided in 15-7-304 and has processed the certificate before the notices required by
subsection (2)(a) are mailed or provided electronically. The department shall notify the county tax appeal board
of the date of the mailing or the date when the taxpayer is informed the information is available electronically.
(3) (a) If the owner of any land and improvements is dissatisfied with the appraisal as it reflects the
market value of the property as determined by the department or with the classification of the land or
improvements, the owner may request an informal classification and appraisal review by submitting an
objection on written or electronic forms provided by the department for that purpose or by checking a box on the
notice and returning it to the department in a manner prescribed by the department.
(i) For property other than class three property described in 15-6-133, class four property
described in 15-6-134, class ten property described in 15-6-143, and centrally assessed property described in
15-23-101, the objection must be submitted within 30 days from the date on the notice.
(ii) For class three property described in 15-6-133, class four property described in 15-6-134, and
class ten property described in 15-6-143, the objection may be made only once each valuation cycle. An
objection must be made in writing or by checking a box on the notice within 30 days from the date on the
classification and appraisal notice for a reduction in the appraised value to be considered for both years of the
2-year valuation cycle. An objection made more than 30 days from the date of the classification and appraisal
notice will be applicable only for the second year of the 2-year valuation cycle. For an objection to apply to the
second year of the valuation cycle, the taxpayer shall make the objection in writing or by checking a box on the
notice no later than June 1 of the second year of the valuation cycle or, if a classification and appraisal notice is
received in the second year of the valuation cycle, within 30 days from the date on the notice.
(iii) For centrally assessed property described in 15-23-101(2)(a), the objection must be submitted
within 20 days from the date on the notice. A taxpayer may submit an objection up to 10 days after this deadline
on request to the department.
(iv) (A) For centrally assessed property described in 15-23-101(2)(b) and (2)(c), an objection to the
valuation or classification may be made only once each valuation cycle. An objection must be made in writing
- 11 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
within the time period specified in subsection (3)(a)(iii) for a reduction in the appraised value to be considered
for both years of the 2-year valuation cycle. An objection made after the deadline specified in subsection
(3)(a)(iii) will be applicable only for the second year of the 2-year valuation cycle. For an objection to apply to
the second year of the valuation cycle, the taxpayer shall make the objection in writing no later than June 1 of
the second year of the valuation cycle or, if a classification and appraisal notice is received in the second year
of the valuation cycle, within the time period specified in subsection (3)(a)(iii).
(B) If a property owner has exhausted the right to object to a valuation, as provided for in
subsection (3)(a)(iv)(A), the property owner may ask the department to consider extenuating circumstances to
adjust the value of property described in 15-23-101(2)(b) or (2)(c). Occurrences that may result in an
adjustment to the value include but are not limited to extraordinary, unusual, or infrequent events that are
material in nature and of a character different from the typical or customary business operations, that are not
expected to recur frequently, and that are not normally considered in the evaluation of the operating results of a
business, including bankruptcies, acquisitions, sales of assets, or mergers.
(b) If the objection relates to residential or commercial property and the objector agrees to the
confidentiality requirements, the department shall provide to the objector, by posted mail or electronically, within
8 weeks of submission of the objection, the following information:
(i) the methodology and sources of data used by the department in the valuation of the property;
and
(ii) if the department uses a blend of evaluations developed from various sources, the reasons that
the methodology was used.
(c) At the request of the objector or a representative of the objector, and only if the objector or
representative signs a written or electronic confidentiality agreement, the department shall provide in written or
electronic form:
(i) comparable sales data used by the department to value the property;
(ii) sales data used by the department to value residential property in the property taxpayer's
market model area; and
(iii) if the cost approach was used by the department to value residential property, the
documentation required in 15-8-111(3) regarding why the comparable sales approach was not reliable.
- 12 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
(d) For properties valued using the income approach as one approximation of market value, notice
must be provided that the taxpayer will be given a form to acknowledge confidentiality requirements for the
receipt of all aggregate model output that the department used in the valuation model for the property.
(e) The review must be conducted informally and is not subject to the contested case procedures
of the Montana Administrative Procedure Act. As a part of the review, the department may consider the actual
selling price of the property and other relevant information presented by the taxpayer in support of the
taxpayer's opinion as to the market value of the property. The department shall consider an independent
appraisal provided by the taxpayer if the appraisal meets standards set by the Montana board of real estate
appraisers and the appraisal was completed within 6 months of the valuation date pursuant to 15-8-201. If the
department does not use the appraisal provided by the taxpayer in conducting the appeal, the department shall
provide to the taxpayer the reason for not using the appraisal. The department shall give reasonable notice to
the taxpayer of the time and place of the review.
(f) After the review, the department shall determine the correct appraisal and classification of the
land or improvements and notify the taxpayer of its determination by mail or electronically. The department may
not determine an appraised value that is higher than the value that was the subject of the objection unless the
reason for an increase was the result of a physical change in the property or caused by an error in the
description of the property or data available for the property that is kept by the department and used for
calculating the appraised value. In the notification, the department shall state its reasons for revising the
classification or appraisal. When the proper appraisal and classification have been determined, the land must
be classified and the improvements appraised in the manner ordered by the department.
(4) Whether a review as provided in subsection (3) is held or not, the department may not adjust
an appraisal or classification upon the taxpayer's objection unless:
(a) the taxpayer has submitted an objection on written or electronic forms provided by the
department or by checking a box on the notice; and
(b) the department has provided to the objector by mail or electronically its stated reason in writing
for making the adjustment.
(5) A taxpayer's written objection or objection made by checking a box on the notice and
supplemental information provided by a taxpayer that elects to check a box on the notice to a classification or
- 13 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
appraisal and the department's notification to the taxpayer of its determination and the reason for that
determination are public records. The department shall make the records available for inspection during regular
office hours.
(6) Except as provided in 15-2-302 and 15-23-102, if a property owner feels aggrieved by the
classification or appraisal made by the department after the review provided for in subsection (3), the property
owner has the right to first appeal to the county tax appeal board and then to the Montana tax appeal board,
whose findings are final subject to the right of review in the courts. The appeal to the county tax appeal board,
pursuant to 15-15-102, must be filed within 30 days from the date on the notice of the department's
determination. A county tax appeal board or the Montana tax appeal board may consider the actual selling price
of the property, independent appraisals of the property, negative property features that differentiate the subject
property from the department's comparable sales, and other relevant information presented by the taxpayer as
evidence of the market value of the property. If the county tax appeal board or the Montana tax appeal board
determines that an adjustment should be made, the department shall adjust the base value of the property in
accordance with the board's order."

Section 11. Section 15-10-420, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-10-420. Procedure for calculating levy. (1) (a) Subject to the provisions of this section, a
governmental entity that is authorized to impose mills may impose a mill levy sufficient to generate the amount
of property taxes actually assessed in the prior year plus one-half of the average rate of inflation for the prior 3
years. The maximum number of mills that a governmental entity may impose is established by calculating the
number of mills required to generate the amount of property tax actually assessed in the governmental unit in
the prior year based on the current year taxable value, less the current year's newly taxable value, plus one-half
of the average rate of inflation for the prior 3 years.
(b) A governmental entity that does not impose the maximum number of mills authorized under
subsection (1)(a) may carry forward the authority to impose the number of mills equal to the difference between
the actual number of mills imposed and the maximum number of mills authorized to be imposed. The mill
authority carried forward may be imposed in a subsequent tax year.
(c) For the purposes of subsection (1)(a), the department shall calculate one-half of the average
- 14 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
rate of inflation for the prior 3 years by using the consumer price index, U.S. city average, all urban consumers,
using the 1982-84 base of 100, as published by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of
labor.
(2) A governmental entity may apply the levy calculated pursuant to subsection (1)(a) plus any
additional levies authorized by the voters, as provided in 15-10-425, to all property in the governmental unit,
including newly taxable property.
(3) (a) For purposes of this section, newly taxable property includes:
(i) annexation of real property and improvements into a taxing unit;
(ii) construction, expansion, or remodeling of improvements;
(iii) transfer of property into a taxing unit;
(iv) subdivision of real property; and
(v) transfer of property from tax-exempt to taxable status.
(b) Newly taxable property does not include an increase in value that arises because of an
increase in the incremental value within a tax increment financing district.
(4) (a) For the purposes of subsection (1), the taxable value of newly taxable property includes the
release of taxable value from the incremental taxable value of a tax increment financing district because of:
(i) a change in the boundary of a tax increment financing district;
(ii) an increase in the base value of the tax increment financing district pursuant to 7-15-4287; or
(iii) the termination of a tax increment financing district.
(b) If a tax increment financing district terminates prior to the certification of taxable values as
required in 15-10-202, the increment value is reported as newly taxable property in the year in which the tax
increment financing district terminates. If a tax increment financing district terminates after the certification of
taxable values as required in 15-10-202, the increment value is reported as newly taxable property in the
following tax year.
(c) For the purpose of subsection (3)(a)(ii), the value of newly taxable class four property that was
constructed, expanded, or remodeled property since the completion of the last reappraisal cycle is the current
year market value of that property less the previous year market value of that property.
(d) For the purpose of subsection (3)(a)(iv), the subdivision of real property includes the first sale
- 15 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
of real property that results in the property being taxable as class four property under 15-6-134 or as
nonqualified agricultural land as described in 15-6-133(1)(c).
(5) Subject to subsection (8), subsection (1)(a) does not apply to:
(a) school district levies established in Title 20; or
(b) a mill levy imposed for a newly created regional resource authority.
(6) For purposes of subsection (1)(a), taxes imposed do not include net or gross proceeds taxes
received under 15-6-131 and 15-6-132.
(7) In determining the maximum number of mills in subsection (1)(a), the governmental entity:
(a) may increase the number of mills to account for a decrease in reimbursements; and
(b) may not increase the number of mills to account for a loss of tax base because of legislative
action that is reimbursed under the provisions of 15-1-121(7); and
(c) may not include revenue distributed to a county to provide state property tax assistance
pursuant to [sections 2 and 5].
(8) The department shall calculate, on a statewide basis, the number of mills to be imposed for
purposes of 15-10-109, 20-9-331, 20-9-333, 20-9-360, and 20-25-439. However, the number of mills calculated
by the department may not exceed the mill levy limits established in those sections. The mill calculation must
be established in tenths of mills. If the mill levy calculation does not result in an even tenth of a mill, then the
calculation must be rounded up to the nearest tenth of a mill.
(9) (a) The provisions of subsection (1) do not prevent or restrict:
(i) a judgment levy under 2-9-316, 7-6-4015, or 7-7-2202;
(ii) a levy to repay taxes paid under protest as provided in 15-1-402;
(iii) an emergency levy authorized under 10-3-405, 20-9-168, or 20-15-326;
(iv) a levy for the support of a study commission under 7-3-184;
(v) a levy for the support of a newly established regional resource authority;
(vi) the portion that is the amount in excess of the base contribution of a governmental entity's
property tax levy for contributions for group benefits excluded under 2-9-212 or 2-18-703;
(vii) a levy for reimbursing a county for costs incurred in transferring property records to an
adjoining county under 7-2-2807 upon relocation of a county boundary;
- 16 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
(viii) a levy used to fund the sheriffs' retirement system under 19-7-404(3)(b); or
(ix) a governmental entity from levying mills for the support of an airport authority in existence prior
to May 7, 2019, regardless of the amount of the levy imposed for the support of the airport authority in the past.
The levy under this subsection (9)(a)(ix) is limited to the amount in the resolution creating the authority.
(b) A levy authorized under subsection (9)(a) may not be included in the amount of property taxes
actually assessed in a subsequent year.
(10) A governmental entity may levy mills for the support of airports as authorized in 67-10-402, 67-
11-301, or 67-11-302 even though the governmental entity has not imposed a levy for the airport or the airport
authority in either of the previous 2 years and the airport or airport authority has not been appropriated
operating funds by a county or municipality during that time.
(11) The department may adopt rules to implement this section. The rules may include a method for
calculating the percentage of change in valuation for purposes of determining the elimination of property, new
improvements, or newly taxable value in a governmental unit."

Section 12. Section 15-15-101, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-15-101. County tax appeal board -- meetings and compensation. (1) The board of county
commissioners of each county shall appoint a county tax appeal board, with a minimum of three members and
with the members to serve staggered terms of 3 years each. The members of each county tax appeal board
must be residents of the county in which they serve. A person may not be a member of a county tax appeal
board if the person was an employee of the department less than 36 months before the date of appointment.
(2) (a) The members receive compensation as provided in subsection (2)(b) and travel expenses,
as provided for in 2-18-501 through 2-18-503, only when the county tax appeal board meets to hear taxpayers'
appeals from property tax assessments or when they are attending meetings called by the Montana tax appeal
board. Travel expenses and compensation must be paid from the appropriation to the Montana tax appeal
board.
(b) (i) The daily compensation for a member is as follows:
(A) $45 for 4 hours of work or less; and
(B) $90 for more than 4 hours of work.
- 17 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
(ii) For the purpose of calculating work hours in this subsection (2)(b), work includes hearing tax
appeals, deliberating with other board members, and attending meetings called by the Montana tax appeal
board.
(3) Office space and equipment for the county tax appeal boards must be furnished by the county.
All other incidental expenses must be paid from the appropriation of the Montana tax appeal board.
(4) The county tax appeal board shall hold an organizational meeting each year on the date of its
first scheduled hearing, immediately before conducting the business for which the hearing was otherwise
scheduled. At the organizational meeting, the members shall choose one member as the presiding officer of the
board. The county tax appeal board shall continue in session from July 1 of the current tax year until December
31 of the current tax year to hear protests concerning assessments made by the department until the business
of hearing protests is disposed of and may meet after December 31 to hear an appeal at the discretion of the
county tax appeal board.
(5) In counties that have appointed more than three members to the county tax appeal board, only
three members shall hear each appeal. The presiding officer shall select the three members hearing each
appeal.
(6) In connection with an appeal, the county tax appeal board may change any assessment or fix
the assessment at some other level or determine eligibility as a principal residence pursuant to [section 7].
Upon notification by the county tax appeal board, the county clerk and recorder shall publish a notice to
taxpayers, giving the time the county tax appeal board will be in session to hear scheduled protests concerning
assessments and the latest date the county tax appeal board may take applications for the hearings. The notice
must be published in a newspaper if any is printed in the county or, if none, then in the manner that the county
tax appeal board directs. The notice must be published by May 15 of the current tax year.
(7) Challenges to a department rule governing the assessment of property or to an assessment
procedure apply only to the taxpayer bringing the challenge and may not apply to all similarly situated taxpayers
unless an action is brought in the district court as provided in 15-1-406."

Section 13. Section 15-15-102, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-15-102. Application for reduction in valuation -- certification as principal residence. (1) The
- 18 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
county tax appeal board may not reduce the valuation of property may not be reduced by the county tax appeal
board or review eligibility as a principal residence under [section 7] unless either the taxpayer or the taxpayer's
agent makes and files a written application for reduction with the county tax appeal board.
(2) The application for reduction may be obtained at the local appraisal office or from the county
tax appeal board. The completed application must be submitted to the county clerk and recorder. The date of
receipt is the date stamped on the appeal form by the county clerk and recorder upon receipt of the form. The
county tax appeal board is responsible for obtaining the applications from the county clerk and recorder.
(3) One application for reduction may be submitted during each valuation cycle. The application
must be submitted within the time periods provided for in [section 9] or 15-7-102(3)(a).
(4) A taxpayer who receives an informal review by the department of revenue as provided in
[section 9] or 15-7-102(3)(a)(i) and (3)(a)(ii) may appeal the decision of the department of revenue to the county
tax appeal board as provided in [section 9(2)] and 15-7-102(6). The taxpayer may not file a subsequent
application for reduction for the same property with the county tax appeal board during the same valuation
cycle.
(5) If the department's determination after review is not made in time to allow the county tax appeal
board to review the matter during the current tax year, the appeal must be reviewed during the next tax year,
but the decision by the county tax appeal board is effective for the year in which the request for review was filed
with the department. The application must state the post-office address of the applicant, specifically describe
the property involved, and state the facts upon which it is claimed the reduction should be made or the property
should be certified as a principal residence."

Section 14. Section 15-15-103, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-15-103. Examination of applicant -- failure to hear application. (1) Before the county tax
appeal board grants any application or makes any reduction applied for, it shall examine on oath the person or
agent making the application with regard to the value of the property of the person or eligibility as a principal
residence pursuant to [section 7]. A reduction may not be made or a property certified as a principal residence
unless the applicant makes an application, as provided in 15-15-102, and attends the county board hearing. An
appeal of the county board's decision may not be made to the Montana tax appeal board unless the person or
- 19 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
the person's agent has exhausted the remedies available through the county board. In order to exhaust the
remedies, the person or the person's agent shall attend the county board hearing. On written request by the
person or the person's agent and on the written concurrence of the department, the county board may waive
the requirement that the person or the person's agent attend the hearing. The testimony of all witnesses at the
hearing and the deliberation of the county tax appeal board in rendering a decision must be electronically
recorded and preserved for 1 year. If the decision of the county board is appealed, the record of the
proceedings, including the electronic recording of all testimony and the deliberation of the county tax appeal
board, must be forwarded, together with all exhibits, to the Montana board. The date of the hearing, the
proceedings before the county board, and the decision must be entered upon the minutes of the county board,
and the county board shall notify the applicant of its decision by mail within 3 days. A copy of the minutes of the
county board must be transmitted to the Montana board no later than 3 days after the county board holds its
final hearing of the year.
(2) (a) Except as provided in 15-15-201, if a county board refuses or fails to hear a taxpayer's
timely application for a reduction in valuation of property or eligibility as a principal residence, the taxpayer's
application is considered to be granted on the day following the county board's final meeting for that year. The
department shall enter the appraisal or classification, or eligibility as a principal residence sought in the
application in the property tax record. An application is not automatically granted for the following appeals:
(i) those listed in 15-2-302(1); and
(ii) if a taxpayer's appeal from the department's determination of classification or appraisal made
pursuant to 15-7-102 was not received in time, as provided for in 15-15-102, to be considered by the county
board during its current session.
(b) The county board shall provide written notification of each application that was automatically
granted pursuant to subsection (2)(a) to the department, the Montana board, and any affected municipal
corporation. The notice must include the name of the taxpayer and a description of the subject property.
(3) The county tax appeal board shall consider an independent appraisal provided by the taxpayer
if the appraisal meets standards set by the Montana board of real estate appraisers and the appraisal was
conducted within 6 months of the valuation date. If the county tax appeal board does not use the appraisal
provided by the taxpayer in conducting the appeal, the county board shall provide to the taxpayer the reason for
- 20 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
not using the appraisal."

Section 15. Section 15-16-101, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-16-101. Treasurer to publish notice -- manner of publication. (1) Within 10 days after the
receipt of the property tax record, the county treasurer shall publish a notice specifying:
(a) that one-half of all taxes levied and assessed will be due and payable before 5 p.m. on the next
November 30 or within 30 days after the notice is postmarked and that unless paid prior to that time the amount
then due will be delinquent and will draw interest at the rate of 5/6 of 1% a month from the time of delinquency
until paid and 2% will be added to the delinquent taxes as a penalty;
(b) that one-half of all taxes levied and assessed will be due and payable on or before 5 p.m. on
the next May 31 and that unless paid prior to that time the taxes will be delinquent and will draw interest at the
rate of 5/6 of 1% a month from the time of delinquency until paid and 2% will be added to the delinquent taxes
as a penalty; and
(c) the time and place at which payment of taxes may be made.
(2) (a) The county treasurer shall send to the last-known address of each taxpayer a written notice,
postage prepaid, showing the amount of taxes and assessments due for the current year and the amount due
and delinquent for other years. The written notice must include:
(i) the taxable value of the property;
(ii) the total mill levy applied to that taxable value;
(iii) itemized city services and special improvement district assessments collected by the county;
(iv) the number of the school district in which the property is located;
(v) the amount of the total tax due itemized by mill levy that is levied as city tax, county tax, state
tax, school district tax, and other tax and, for a principal residence, the total amount of state property tax
assistance received under [section 5];
(vi) an indication of which mill levies are voted levies, including voted levies to impose a new mill
levy, to increase a mill levy that is required to be submitted to the electors, or to exceed the mill levy limit
provided for in 15-10-420;
(vii) except as provided in subsection (2)(c), an itemization of the taxes due for each mill levy and a
- 21 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
comparison to the amount due for each mill levy in the prior year; and
(viii) a notice of the availability of all the property tax assistance programs available to property
taxpayers, including the state property tax assistance provided for in [section 5], the intangible land value
assistance program provided for in 15-6-240, the property tax assistance programs under Title 15, chapter 6,
part 3, and the residential property tax credit for the elderly under 15-30-2337 through 15-30-2341.
(b) If a tax lien is attached to the property, the notice must also include, in a manner calculated to
draw attention, a statement that a tax lien is attached to the property, that failure to respond will result in loss of
property, and that the taxpayer may contact the county treasurer for complete information.
(c) The information required in subsection (2)(a)(vii) may be posted on the county treasurer's
website instead of being included on the written notice.
(3) The municipality shall, upon request of the county treasurer, provide the information to be
included under subsection (2)(a)(iii) ready for mailing.
(4) The notice in every case must be given as provided in 7-1-2121. Failure to publish or post
notices does not relieve the taxpayer from any tax liability. Any failure to give notice of the tax due for the
current year or of delinquent tax will not affect the legality of the tax.
(5) If the department revises an assessment that results in an additional tax of $5 or less, an
additional tax is not owed and a new tax bill does not need to be prepared."

Section 16. Section 15-17-125, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-17-125. Attachment of tax lien and preparation of tax lien certificate. (1) (a) The county
treasurer shall attach a tax lien no later than the first working day in August to properties on which the taxes are
delinquent and for which proper notification was given as provided in 15-17-122 and subsection (4) of this
section. Upon attachment of a tax lien, the county is the possessor of the tax lien unless the tax lien is assigned
pursuant to 15-17-323.
(b) The county treasurer may not attach a tax lien to a property on which taxes are delinquent but
for which proper notice was not given.
(2) After attaching a tax lien, the county treasurer shall prepare a tax lien certificate that must
contain:
- 22 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
(a) the date on which the property taxes became delinquent;
(b) the date on which a property tax lien was attached to the property;
(c) the name and address of record of the person to whom the taxes were assessed;
(d) a description of the property on which the taxes were assessed;
(e) a separate listing of the amount of the delinquent taxes, penalties, interest, and costs;
(f) a statement that the tax lien certificate represents a lien on the property that may lead to the
issuance of a tax deed for the property;
(g) a statement specifying the date on which the county or an assignee will be entitled to a tax
deed; and
(h) an identification number corresponding to the tax lien certificate.
(3) The tax lien certificate must be signed by the county treasurer. A copy of the tax lien certificate
must be filed by the treasurer in the office of the county clerk. A copy of the tax lien certificate must also be
mailed to the person to whom the taxes were assessed, at the address of record, together with a notice that the
person may contact the county treasurer for further information on property tax liens.
(4) Prior to attaching a tax lien to the property, the county treasurer shall send notice of the
pending attachment of a tax lien to the person to whom the property was assessed. The notice must include the
information listed in subsection (2), state that the tax lien may be assigned to a third party, and provide notice of
the availability of all the property tax assistance programs available to property taxpayers, including the state
property tax assistance provided for in [section 5], the property tax assistance programs under Title 15, chapter
6, part 3, and the residential property tax credit for the elderly under 15-30-2337 through 15-30-2341. The
notice must have been mailed at least 2 weeks prior to the date on which the county treasurer attaches the tax
lien.
(5) The county treasurer shall file the tax lien certificate with the county clerk and recorder."

Section 17. Section 15-65-121, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-65-121. (Temporary) Distribution of tax proceeds. (1) The proceeds of the tax imposed by 15-
65-111 must, in accordance with the provisions of 17-2-124, be deposited in an account in the state special
revenue fund to the credit of the department. The department may spend from that account in accordance with
- 23 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
an expenditure appropriation by the legislature based on an estimate of the costs of collecting and disbursing
the proceeds of the tax. Before allocating the balance of the tax proceeds in accordance with the provisions of
17-2-124 and as provided in subsections (2)(a) through (2)(j) of this section, the department shall determine the
expenditures by state agencies for in-state lodging for each reporting period and deduct 4% of that amount from
the tax proceeds received each reporting period. The department shall distribute the portion of the 4% that was
paid with federal funds to the department of administration for return to the federal government and deposit
30% of the amount deducted less the portion paid with federal funds in the state general fund.
(2) The balance of the tax proceeds received each reporting period and not deducted pursuant to
the expenditure appropriation, deposited in the state general fund, distributed to agencies that paid the tax with
federal funds, or deposited in the heritage preservation and development account must be transferred to an
account in the state special revenue fund to the credit of the department of commerce for the purposes
designated under 90-1-122, to the emergency lodging for victims of domestic violence or human trafficking
account, to the Montana historical interpretation state special revenue account, to the Montana historical
society, to the university system, to the state-tribal economic development commission, and to the department
of fish, wildlife, and parks, as follows:
(a) 1% to the Montana historical society to be used for the installation or maintenance of roadside
historical signs and historic sites;
(b) 2.5% to the university system for the establishment and maintenance of a Montana travel
research program;
(c) 6.5% to the department of fish, wildlife, and parks for the maintenance of facilities in state parks
that have both resident and nonresident use;
(d) 1.4% to the invasive species state special revenue account established in 80-7-1004;
(e) 60.2% to be used directly by the department of commerce as provided in 90-1-122[, and in part
to renovate the Miles City train depot];
(f) 0.1% to the emergency lodging for victims of domestic violence or human trafficking account
established in 44-4-1506;
(g) (i) except as provided in subsection (2)(g)(ii), 22.5% to be distributed by the department to
regional nonprofit tourism corporations in the ratio of the proceeds collected in each tourism region to the total
- 24 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
proceeds collected statewide; and
(ii) if 22.5% of the proceeds collected annually within the limits of a city, consolidated city-county,
resort area, or resort area district exceeds $35,000, 50% of the amount available for distribution to the regional
nonprofit tourism corporation in the region where the city, consolidated city-county, resort area, or resort area
district is located, to be distributed to the nonprofit convention and visitors bureau in that city, consolidated city-
county, resort area, or resort area district;
(h) 0.5% to the state special revenue account provided for in 90-1-135 for use by the state-tribal
economic development commission established in 90-1-131 for activities in the Indian tourism region;
(i) 2.6% to the Montana historical interpretation state special revenue account established in 22-3-
115; and
(j) 2.7% or $1 million, whichever is less, to the Montana heritage preservation and development
account provided for in 22-3-1004. The Montana heritage preservation and development commission shall
report on the use of funds received pursuant to this subsection (2)(j) to the legislative finance committee on a
semiannual basis, in accordance with 5-11-210.
(3) If a city, consolidated city-county, resort area, or resort area district qualifies under 15-68-
820(5)(b)(iii) (4)(b)(iii) or this section for funds but fails to either recognize a nonprofit convention and visitors
bureau or submit and gain approval for an annual marketing plan as required in 15-65-122, then those funds
must be allocated to the regional nonprofit tourism corporation in the region in which the city, consolidated city-
county, resort area, or resort area district is located.
(4) If a regional nonprofit tourism corporation fails to submit and gain approval for an annual
marketing plan as required in 15-65-122, then those funds otherwise allocated to the regional nonprofit tourism
corporation may be used by the department of commerce for tourism promotion and promotion of the state as a
location for the production of motion pictures and television commercials.
(5) The tax proceeds received that are transferred to a state special revenue account pursuant to
subsections (2)(a) through (2)(c), (2)(e), and (2)(g) are statutorily appropriated to the entities as provided in 17-
7-502. The tax proceeds received that are transferred to the emergency lodging for victims of domestic violence
or human trafficking account pursuant to subsection (2)(f) are subject to the appropriation provisions in 44-4-
1506.
- 25 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
(6) The tax proceeds received that are transferred to the invasive species state special revenue
account pursuant to subsection (2)(d), to the Montana historical interpretation state special revenue account
pursuant to subsection (2)(i), and to the Montana heritage preservation and development account pursuant to
subsection (2)(j) are subject to appropriation by the legislature. (Terminates June 30, 2027--sec. 12, Ch. 563, L.
2021; sec. 10, Ch. 758, L. 2023; bracketed language in subsection (1)(e) terminates June 30, 2025--sec. 34,
Ch. 763, L. 2023.)
15-65-121. (Effective July 1, 2027) Distribution of tax proceeds. (1) The proceeds of the tax
imposed by 15-65-111 must, in accordance with the provisions of 17-2-124, be deposited in an account in the
state special revenue fund to the credit of the department. The department may spend from that account in
accordance with an expenditure appropriation by the legislature based on an estimate of the costs of collecting
and disbursing the proceeds of the tax. Before allocating the balance of the tax proceeds in accordance with
the provisions of 17-2-124 and as provided in subsections (2)(a) through (2)(h) of this section, the department
shall determine the expenditures by state agencies for in-state lodging for each reporting period and deduct 4%
of that amount from the tax proceeds received each reporting period. The department shall distribute the
portion of the 4% that was paid with federal funds to the department of administration for return to the federal
government and deposit 30% of the amount deducted less the portion paid with federal funds in the state
general fund. The amount of $400,000 each year must be deposited in the Montana heritage preservation and
development account provided for in 22-3-1004.
(2) The balance of the tax proceeds received each reporting period and not deducted pursuant to
the expenditure appropriation, deposited in the state general fund, distributed to agencies that paid the tax with
federal funds, or deposited in the heritage preservation and development account must be transferred to an
account in the state special revenue fund to the credit of the department of commerce for the purposes
designated under 90-1-122, to the Montana historical interpretation state special revenue account, to the
Montana historical society, to the university system, to the state-tribal economic development commission, and
to the department of fish, wildlife, and parks, as follows:
(a) 1% to the Montana historical society to be used for the installation or maintenance of roadside
historical signs and historic sites;
(b) 2.5% to the university system for the establishment and maintenance of a Montana travel
- 26 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
research program;
(c) 6.5% to the department of fish, wildlife, and parks for the maintenance of facilities in state parks
that have both resident and nonresident use;
(d) 1.4% to the invasive species state special revenue account established in 80-7-1004;
(e) 63% to be used directly by the department of commerce as provided in 90-1-122;
(f) (i) except as provided in subsection (2)(f)(ii), 22.5% to be distributed by the department to
regional nonprofit tourism corporations in the ratio of the proceeds collected in each tourism region to the total
proceeds collected statewide; and
(ii) if 22.5% of the proceeds collected annually within the limits of a city, consolidated city-county,
resort area, or resort area district exceeds $35,000, 50% of the amount available for distribution to the regional
nonprofit tourism corporation in the region where the city, consolidated city-county, resort area, or resort area
district is located, to be distributed to the nonprofit convention and visitors bureau in that city, consolidated city-
county, resort area, or resort area district;
(g) 0.5% to the state special revenue account provided for in 90-1-135 for use by the state-tribal
economic development commission established in 90-1-131 for activities in the Indian tourism region; and
(h) 2.6% to the Montana historical interpretation state special revenue account established in 22-3-
115.
(3) If a city, consolidated city-county, resort area, or resort area district qualifies under 15-68-
820(5)(b)(iii) (4)(b)(iii) or this section for funds but fails to either recognize a nonprofit convention and visitors
bureau or submit and gain approval for an annual marketing plan as required in 15-65-122, then those funds
must be allocated to the regional nonprofit tourism corporation in the region in which the city, consolidated city-
county, resort area, or resort area district is located.
(4) If a regional nonprofit tourism corporation fails to submit and gain approval for an annual
marketing plan as required in 15-65-122, then those funds otherwise allocated to the regional nonprofit tourism
corporation may be used by the department of commerce for tourism promotion and promotion of the state as a
location for the production of motion pictures and television commercials.
(5) The tax proceeds received that are transferred to a state special revenue account pursuant to
subsections (2)(a) through (2)(c), (2)(e), and (2)(f) are statutorily appropriated to the entities as provided in 17-
- 27 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
7-502.
(6) The tax proceeds received that are transferred to the invasive species state special revenue
account pursuant to subsection (2)(d) and to the Montana historical interpretation state special revenue account
pursuant to subsection (2)(h) are subject to appropriation by the legislature."

Section 18. Section 15-68-102, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-68-102. Imposition and rate of sales tax and use tax -- exceptions. (1) A sales tax of the
following percentages is imposed on sales of the following property or services:
(a) 4% on accommodations and campgrounds;
(b) 4% on the base rental charge for rental vehicles;
(c) 1% on accommodations and campgrounds in addition to the imposition in subsection (1)(a);
and
(d) 1% on the base rental charge for rental vehicles in addition to the imposition in subsection
(1)(b).
(2) The sales tax is imposed on the purchaser and must be collected by the seller and paid to the
department by the seller. The seller holds all sales taxes collected in trust for the state. The sales tax must be
applied to the sales price.
(3) (a) For the privilege of using property or services within this state, there is imposed on the
person using the following property or services a use tax equal to the following percentages of the value of the
property or services:
(i) 4% on accommodations and campgrounds;
(ii) 4% on the base rental charge for rental vehicles;
(iii) 1% on accommodations and campgrounds in addition to the imposition in subsection (3)(a)(i);
and
(iv) 1% on the base rental charge for rental vehicles in addition to the imposition in subsection
(3)(a)(ii).
(b) The use tax is imposed on property or services that were:
(i) acquired outside this state as the result of a transaction that would have been subject to the
- 28 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
sales tax had it occurred within this state;
(ii) acquired within the exterior boundaries of an Indian reservation within this state as a result of a
transaction that would have been subject to the sales tax had it occurred outside the exterior boundaries of an
Indian reservation within this state;
(iii) acquired as the result of a transaction that was not initially subject to the sales tax imposed by
subsection (1) or the use tax imposed by subsection (3)(a) but which transaction, because of the buyer's
subsequent use of the property, is subject to the sales tax or use tax; or
(iv) rendered as the result of a transaction that was not initially subject to the sales tax or use tax
but that because of the buyer's subsequent use of the services is subject to the sales tax or use tax.
(4) For purposes of this section, the value of property must be determined as of the time of
acquisition, introduction into this state, or conversion to use, whichever is latest.
(5) The sale of property or services exempt or nontaxable under this chapter is exempt from the
tax imposed in subsections (1) and (3).
(6) Lodging facilities and campgrounds are exempt from the tax imposed in subsections (1)(a) and
(3)(a)(i) until October 1, 2003, for contracts entered into prior to April 30, 2003, that provide for a guaranteed
charge for accommodations or campgrounds."

Section 19. Section 15-68-820, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-68-820. Sales tax and use tax proceeds. (1) (a) Except as provided in subsections (2) through
(6), all All money collected under this chapter 15-68-102(1)(a), (1)(b), (3)(a)(i), and (3)(a)(ii) must, in
accordance with the provisions of 17-2-124, be deposited by the department into the general fund as provided
in subsections (2) through (4).
(b) All money collected under 15-68-102(1)(c), (1)(d), (3)(a)(iii) and (3)(a)(iv) must, in accordance
with the provisions of 17-2-124, be deposited by the department into the state property tax assistance account
provided for in [section 6].
(2) Twenty-five percent of the The revenue collected on the base rental charge for rental vehicles
under 15-68-102(1)(b) and 15-68-102(3)(a)(ii) must be deposited as follows:
(a) 75% in the state property tax assistance account provided for in [section 6]; and
- 29 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
(b) 25% in the state special revenue fund to the credit of the senior citizen and persons with
disabilities transportation services account provided for in 7-14-112.
(3) Until December 31, 2024, a portion of the The revenue collected on the sale or use of
accommodations and campgrounds under 15-68-102(1)(a) and (3)(a)(i) must be deposited as follows:
(a) 20% in the account established in 22-3-1303 for construction of the Montana heritage center;
and
(b) 5% in the account established in 22-3-1307 for historic preservation grants.
(4) Starting January 1, 2025, a portion of the revenue collected on the sale or use of
accommodations and campgrounds under 15-68-102 (1)(a) and (3)(a)(i) must be deposited or distributed as
follows:
(a) 75% in the state property tax assistance account provided for in [section 6];
(a) (b) 6% in the account established in 22-3-1304 for operation and maintenance of the Montana
heritage center;
(b) (c) 6% distributed as provided in subsection (5) (4);
(c) (d) 6% in the account established in 22-3-1307 for historic preservation grants; and
(d) (e) 7% in the account established in 17-7-209.
(5) (4) (a) Before allocating the balance of the tax proceeds in accordance with the provisions of 17-2-
124 and as provided in subsection (5)(b) (4)(b) of this section, the department shall determine the expenditures
by state agencies for in-state lodging for each reporting period and deduct 1% of that amount from the tax
proceeds received each reporting period. The department shall distribute the portion of the 1% that was paid
with federal funds to the department of administration for return to the federal government and deposit 30% of
the amount deducted less the portion paid with federal funds in the state general fund.
(b) The balance of the tax proceeds received each reporting period and not distributed to agencies
that paid the tax with federal funds must be transferred to an account in the state special revenue fund to the
credit of the department of commerce for tourism promotion and promotion of the state as a location for the
production of motion pictures and television commercials, to the department of fish, wildlife, and parks, and to
the state-tribal economic development commission as follows:
(i) 7% to the department of fish, wildlife, and parks for the maintenance of facilities in state parks
- 30 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
that have both resident and nonresident use;
(ii) 68.5% to be used directly by the department of commerce;
(iii) (A) except as provided in subsection (5)(b)(iii)(B) (4)(b)(iii)(B), 24% to be distributed by the
department of commerce to regional nonprofit tourism corporations in the ratio of the proceeds collected in
each tourism region to the total proceeds collected statewide; and
(B) if 24% of the proceeds collected annually within the limits of a city, consolidated city-county,
resort area, or resort area district exceeds $35,000, 50% of the amount available for distribution to the regional
nonprofit tourism corporation in the region where the city, consolidated city-county, resort area, or resort area
district is located to be distributed to the nonprofit convention and visitors bureau in that city, consolidated city-
county, resort area, or resort area district; and
(iv) 0.5% to the state special revenue account provided for in 90-1-135 for use by the state-tribal
economic development commission established in 90-1-131 for activities in the Indian tourism region.
(6) (5) The tax proceeds received that are transferred to a state special revenue account pursuant to
subsection (5)(b) (4)(b) are allocated to the entities."

Section 20. Section 17-7-502, MCA, is amended to read:
"17-7-502. Statutory appropriations -- definition -- requisites for validity. (1) A statutory
appropriation is an appropriation made by permanent law that authorizes spending by a state agency without
the need for a biennial legislative appropriation or budget amendment.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4), to be effective, a statutory appropriation must comply with
both of the following provisions:
(a) The law containing the statutory authority must be listed in subsection (3).
(b) The law or portion of the law making a statutory appropriation must specifically state that a
statutory appropriation is made as provided in this section.
(3) The following laws are the only laws containing statutory appropriations: 2-17-105; 5-11-120; 5-
11-407; 5-13-403; 5-13-404; 7-4-2502; 7-4-2924; 7-32-236; 10-1-108; 10-1-1202; 10-1-1303; 10-2-603; 10-2-
807; 10-3-203; 10-3-310; 10-3-312; 10-3-314; 10-3-316; 10-3-802; 10-3-1304; 10-4-304; 10-4-310; [section 3];
15-1-121; 15-1-142; 15-1-143; 15-1-218; 15-1-2302; [section 6]; 15-31-165; 15-31-1004; 15-31-1005; 15-35-
- 31 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
108; 15-36-332; 15-37-117; 15-39-110; 15-65-121; 15-70-128; 15-70-131; 15-70-132; 15-70-433; 16-11-119;
16-11-509; 17-3-106; 17-3-212; 17-3-222; 17-3-241; 17-6-101; 17-6-214; 17-7-133; 17-7-215; 18-11-112; 19-3-
319; 19-3-320; 19-6-410; 19-9-702; 19-13-604; 19-17-301; 19-18-512; 19-19-305; 19-19-506; 19-20-604; 19-
20-607; 19-21-203; 20-3-369; 20-7-1709; 20-8-107; 20-9-250; 20-9-534; 20-9-622; [ 20-15-328]; 20-26-617; 20-
26-1503; 22-1-327; 22-3-116; 22-3-117; [ 22-3-1004]; 23-4-105; 23-5-306; 23-5-409; 23-5-612; 23-7-301; 23-7-
402; 30-10-1004; 37-43-204; 37-50-209; 37-54-113; 39-71-503; 41-5-2011; 42-2-105; 44-4-1101; 44-4-1506;
44-12-213; 44-13-102; 50-1-115; 53-1-109; 53-6-148; 53-9-113; 53-24-108; 53-24-206; 60-5-530; 60-11-115;
61-3-321; 61-3-415; 67-1-309; 69-3-870; 69-4-527; 75-1-1101; 75-5-1108; 75-6-214; 75-11-313; 75-26-308; 76-
13-150; 76-13-151; 76-13-417; 76-17-103; 77-1-108; 77-2-362; 80-2-222; 80-4-416; 80-11-518; 80-11-1006;
81-1-112; 81-1-113; 81-2-203; 81-7-106; 81-7-123; 81-10-103; 82-11-161; 85-20-1504; 85-20-1505; [ 85-25-
102]; 87-1-603; 87-5-909; 90-1-115; 90-1-205; 90-1-504; 90-6-331; and 90-9-306.
(4) There is a statutory appropriation to pay the principal, interest, premiums, and any costs or fees
associated with issuing, paying, securing, redeeming, or defeasing all bonds, notes, or other obligations, as due
in the ordinary course or when earlier called for redemption or defeased, that have been authorized and issued
pursuant to the laws of Montana. Agencies that have entered into agreements authorized by the laws of
Montana to pay the state treasurer, for deposit in accordance with 17-2-101 through 17-2-107, as determined
by the state treasurer, an amount sufficient to pay the principal and interest as due on the bonds or notes have
statutory appropriation authority for the payments. (In subsection (3): pursuant to sec. 10, Ch. 360, L. 1999, the
inclusion of 19-20-604 terminates contingently when the amortization period for the teachers' retirement
system's unfunded liability is 10 years or less; pursuant to sec. 73, Ch. 44, L. 2007, the inclusion of 19-6-410
terminates contingently upon the death of the last recipient eligible under 19-6-709(2) for the supplemental
benefit provided by 19-6-709; pursuant to sec. 5, Ch. 383, L. 2015, the inclusion of 85-25-102 is effective on
occurrence of contingency; pursuant to sec. 6, Ch. 423, L. 2015, the inclusion of 22-3-116 and 22-3-117
terminates June 30, 2025; pursuant to sec. 4, Ch. 122, L. 2017, the inclusion of 10-3-1304 terminates
September 30, 2025; pursuant to sec. 1, Ch. 213, L. 2017, the inclusion of 90-6-331 terminates June 30, 2027;
pursuant to sec. 10, Ch. 374, L. 2017, the inclusion of 76-17-103 terminates June 30, 2027; pursuant to secs.
11, 12, and 14, Ch. 343, L. 2019, the inclusion of 15-35-108 terminates June 30, 2027; pursuant to sec. 1, Ch.
408, L. 2019, the inclusion of 17-7-215 terminates June 30, 2029; pursuant to secs. 1, 2, 3, Ch. 139, L. 2021,
- 32 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
the inclusion of 53-9-113 terminates June 30, 2027; pursuant to sec. 8, Ch. 200, L. 2021, the inclusion of 10-4-
310 terminates July 1, 2031; pursuant to secs. 3, 4, Ch. 404, L. 2021, the inclusion of 30-10-1004 terminates
June 30, 2027; pursuant to sec. 5, Ch. 548, L. 2021, the inclusion of 50-1-115 terminates June 30, 2025;
pursuant to secs. 5 and 12, Ch. 563, L. 2021, the inclusion of 22-3-1004 is effective July 1, 2027; pursuant to
sec. 1, Ch. 20, L. 2023, sec. 2, Ch. 20, L. 2023, and sec. 3, Ch. 20, L. 2023, the inclusion of 81-1-112, 81-1-
113, and 81-7-106 terminates June 30, 2029; pursuant to sec. 9, Ch. 44, L. 2023, the inclusion of 15-1-142
terminates December 31, 2025; pursuant to sec. 10, Ch. 47, L. 2023, the inclusion of 15-1-2302 terminates
June 30, 2025; pursuant to sec. 2, Ch. 374, L. 2023, the inclusion of 10-3-802 terminates June 30, 2031;
pursuant to sec. 12, Ch. 558, L. 2023, the inclusion of 20-9-250 terminates December 31, 2029; pursuant to
sec. 4, Ch. 621, L. 2023, the inclusion of 22-1-327 terminates July 1, 2029; pursuant to sec. 24, Ch. 722, L.
2023, the inclusion of 17-7-133 terminates June 30, 2027; pursuant to sec. 10, Ch. 758, L. 2023, the inclusion
of 44-4-1506 terminates June 30, 2027; and pursuant to sec. 10, Ch. 764, L. 2023, the inclusion of 15-1-143
terminates December 31, 2025.)"

Section 21. Section 22-3-1303, MCA, is amended to read:
"22-3-1303. Account -- Montana heritage center construction. There is an account in the capital
projects fund established in 17-2-102 known as the Montana heritage center construction account. The tax
collections allocated in the former 15-68-820(3)(a) before the amendments of [this act] must be deposited in the
account until December 31, 2024. The money in the account is authorized to the department of administration
and may be used only for capital construction of the Montana heritage center."

Section 22. Section 22-3-1304, MCA, is amended to read:
"22-3-1304. Account -- Montana heritage center operations. There is an account in the state
special revenue fund established in 17-2-102 known as the Montana heritage center operations account. The
tax collections allocated in 15-68-820(4)(a) must be deposited in the account. The money in the account may
be used only for expenses incurred in the operation and maintenance of the Montana heritage center, which
may include the veterans' and pioneer memorial building."

- 33 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
Section 23. Section 22-3-1307, MCA, is amended to read:
"22-3-1307. Historic preservation grant program account. (1) There is an account in the state
special revenue fund established in 17-2-102 known as the historic preservation grant program account. The
tax collections allocated in 15-68-820(3)(b) and (4)(c) must be deposited in the account.
(2) Money deposited in the account is subject to appropriation by the legislature and may be used
only for historic preservation grants to be administered by the department of commerce.
(3) The department shall allocate and disburse historic preservation account funds as appropriated
by the legislature."

NEW SECTION. Section 24. Transfer of funds. (1) The state treasurer shall transfer the total
amount of unobligated funds as of [the effective date of this section] in the debt and liability free account
established in 17-6-214, not to exceed $300 million, to the state property tax assistance account as provided for
in [section 6].
(2) The state treasurer shall transfer all general fund reversions from Chapter 47, Laws of 2023
and Chapter 764, Laws of 2023 for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, that were not expended on property tax
rebates and administration costs pursuant to 15-1-2301 through 15-1-2304 to the state property tax assistance
account provided for in [section 6].

NEW SECTION. Section 25. Transition. The distribution to counties pursuant to [section 6] must be
made by August 31, 2026, for taxes collected in fiscal year 2026.

NEW SECTION. Section 26. Codification instruction. (1) [Section 5] is intended to be codified as
an integral part of Title 7, chapter 6, part 25, and the provisions of Title 7, chapter 6, part 25, apply to [section
5].
(2) [Sections 6 through 9] are intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 15, chapter 6, and
the provisions of Title 15, chapter 6, apply to [sections 6 through 9].

NEW SECTION. Section 27. Effective dates. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), [this act] is
- 34 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 946.1
effective July 1, 2025.
(2) [Sections 1 through 4, 6, 24] and this section are effective on passage and approval.

COORDINATION SECTION. Section 28. Coordination instruction. If both Senate Bill No. 90 and
[this act] are passed and approved, then:
(1) [sections 5 through 17, 21 through 23, and 25 of this act] are void;
(2) the amendments to 15-68-820(2) through (5) in [section 19 of this act] are void; and
(3) all references to the state property tax assistance account provided for in [section 6 of this act]
must be changed to references to the state property tax assistance account in [section 2 of Senate Bill No. 90].

NEW SECTION. Section 29. Applicability. [This act] applies to sales of accommodations or
campgrounds and sales of rental cars that occur on or after July 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Section 30. Termination. [Sections 1 through 4] terminate December 31, 2025.
- END -
- 35 - Authorized Print Version – HB 946